Maryland, session 2025, HB1300.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Regulation
16–201.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Licensed retailer” means a person licensed by the clerk under § 16–205(b) of
this subtitle to act as a retailer.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1300*

HOUSE BILL 1300
(k) “Retailer” means a person who:
(1) sells cigarettes to consumers through vending machines on fewer than
40 premises;
(2) otherwise sells cigarettes to consumers; or
(3) holds cigarettes for sale to consumers.
16–204.
(b) (1) An applicant for a license to act as a retailer shall:
(i) obtain the county license required under § 16–301 of this title;
(ii) submit to the clerk an application for each permanent or
temporary place of business located in the same enclosure and operated by the same
applicant; and
(iii) pay to the clerk a fee of $30.
16–301.
Whenever a person sells cigarettes at retail in a county, the person must have a
county license for:
(1) each place of business; and
(2) each vending machine, if the applicant sells cigarettes through a
vending machine.
16–302.
(a) (1) [For] SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, FOR each
county license, an applicant shall:
[(1)] (I) submit an application to the clerk; and
[(2)] (II) pay to the clerk a license fee of $300.
(2) IN BALTIMORE CITY ONLY, BEFORE A CLERK MAY ISSUE A
COUNTY LICENSE UNDER § 16–303 OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE CLERK SHALL PROVIDE
PUBLIC NOTICE BY:

HOUSE BILL 1300 3
(I) PUBLICATION OF A NOTICE OF THE APPLICATION TWO
TIMES FOR 2 SUCCESSIVE WEEKS IN TWO NEWSPAPERS OF GENERAL CIRCULATION
IN BALTIMORE CITY THAT STATES:
1. THE NAME OF THE APPLICANT;
2. THAT THE APPLICANT IS APPLYING FOR A COUNTY
LICENSE TO SELL CIGARETTES AT RETAIL IN THE CITY; AND
3. THE LOCATION OF THE BUSINESS DESCRIBED IN THE
APPLICATION; AND
(II) POSTING A NOTICE IN A CONSPICUOUS PLACE AT THE
LOCATION OF THE BUSINESS DESCRIBED IN THE APPLICATION FOR AT LEAST 10
DAYS.
16.5–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “County license” means a license issued by the clerk to sell other tobacco
products at retail in a county.
(f) “Licensed other tobacco products retailer” means a person licensed by the
clerk under § 16.5–204(b) of this title to act as an other tobacco products retailer.
16.5–203.
(b) (1) An applicant for a license to act as an other tobacco products retailer or
a tobacconist:
(i) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, shall
obtain a county license by submitting to the clerk an application for each permanent or
temporary place of business located in the same enclosure and operated by the same
applicant; and
(ii) except as provided in paragraph [(2)] (3) of this subsection, shall
pay to the clerk a fee of $15.
(2) IN BALTIMORE CITY ONLY, BEFORE A CLERK MAY ISSUE A
COUNTY LICENSE UNDER THIS SUBTITLE, THE CLERK SHALL PROVIDE PUBLIC
NOTICE BY:

HOUSE BILL 1300
(I) PUBLICATION OF A NOTICE OF THE APPLICATION TWO
TIMES FOR 2 SUCCESSIVE WEEKS IN TWO NEWSPAPERS OF GENERAL CIRCULATION
IN BALTIMORE CITY THAT STATES:
1. THE NAME OF THE APPLICANT;
2. THAT THE APPLICANT IS APPLYING FOR A COUNTY
LICENSE TO SELL OTHER TOBACCO PRODUCTS AT RETAIL IN THE CITY; AND
3. THE LOCATION OF THE BUSINESS DESCRIBED IN THE
APPLICATION; AND
(II) POSTING A NOTICE IN A CONSPICUOUS PLACE AT THE
LOCATION OF THE BUSINESS DESCRIBED IN THE APPLICATION FOR AT LEAST 10
DAYS.
[(2)] (3) A person who has a license issued under Title 16 of this article to
act as a cigarette retailer or to act as a special cigarette retailer is not required to pay the
license fee.
[(3)] (4) The application shall:
(i) be made on the form that the clerk requires; and
(ii) contain the information that the Executive Director requires.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.